Maryland, session 2026, SB0715.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–8C–01.
This subtitle applies only:
(1) In a county in which the circuit administrative judge has established a
Truancy Reduction Pilot Program under § 3–8C–02 of this subtitle; and
(2) To the extent that funds are provided in an annual State budget for a
Truancy Reduction Pilot Program.
3–8C–02.
(a) (1) The Circuit Administrative Judge of the First Circuit may establish a
Truancy Reduction Pilot Program in one or more of the juvenile courts in Dorchester
County, Somerset County, Wicomico County, and Worcester County.
– 1 –

Ch. 812 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The Circuit Administrative Judge of the Second Circuit may establish
a Truancy Reduction Pilot Program in the juvenile courts in Kent County and Talbot
County.
(3) The Circuit Administrative Judge of the Third Circuit may establish a
Truancy Reduction Pilot Program in the juvenile court in Harford County.
(4) THE CIRCUIT ADMINISTRATIVE JUDGE OF THE FOURTH CIRCUIT
MAY ESTABLISH A TRUANCY REDUCTION PILOT PROGRAM IN THE JUVENILE COURT
IN WASHINGTON COUNTY.
[(4)] (5) The Circuit Administrative Judge of the Sixth Circuit may
establish a Truancy Reduction Pilot Program in the juvenile court in Frederick County.
[(5)] (6) The Circuit Administrative Judge of the Seventh Circuit may
establish a Truancy Reduction Pilot Program in the juvenile court in Prince George’s
County.
(b) After consultation with the administrative judges of the first, second, third,
FOURTH, sixth, and seventh circuits, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland
may accept a gift or grant to implement the pilot programs in each respective circuit.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –